Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5738.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) "Adult" means: (a) A person 18 years of age or older. (b) A person who is placed in an adult foster care family home or an adult foster care small group home according to section 5(6) or (8) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.115. (2) "Adult foster care camp" or "adult camp" means an adult foster care facility with the approved capacity to receive more than 4 adults to be provided foster care. An adult foster care camp is a facility located in a natural or rural environment. (3) "Adult foster care congregate facility" means an adult foster care facility with the approved capacity to receive more than 20 adults to be provided with foster care. (4) "Adult foster care facility" means a home or facility that provides foster care to adults. Subject to section 26a(1), adult foster care facility includes facilities and foster care family homes for adults who are aged, mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or physically disabled who require supervision on an ongoing basis but who do not require continuous nursing care. Adult foster care facility does not include any of the following: (a) A nursing home licensed under part 217 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21701 to 333.21799e. (b) A home for the aged licensed under part 213 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21301 to 333.21335. (c) A hospital licensed under part 215 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.21501 to 333.21571. (d) A hospital for the mentally ill or a facility for the developmentally disabled operated by the department of health and human services under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (e) A county infirmary operated by a county department of health and human services under section 55 of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.55. (f) A child caring institution, children's camp, foster family home, or foster family group home licensed or approved under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, if the number of residents who become 18 years of age while residing in the institution, camp, or home does not exceed the following: (i) Two, if the total number of residents is 10 or fewer. (ii) Three, if the total number of residents is not less than 11 and not more than 14. (iii) Four, if the total number of residents is not less than 15 and not more than 20. (iv) Five, if the total number of residents is 21 or more. (g) A foster family home licensed or approved under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, that has a person who is 18 years of age or older placed in the foster family home under section 5(7) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.115. (h) An establishment commonly described as an alcohol or a substance use disorder rehabilitation center, except if licensed or exempt from licensure as both a substance use disorder services program and also licensed as an adult foster care facility and approved as a co-occurring enhanced crisis residential program, a residential facility for persons released from or assigned to adult correctional institutions, a maternity home, or a hotel or rooming house that does not provide or offer to provide foster care. (i) A facility created by former 1885 PA 152. , MCL 36.1 to 36.12. (j) An area excluded from the definition of adult foster care facility under section 17(3) of the continuing care community disclosure act, 2014 PA 448, MCL 554.917. (k) A private residence with the capacity to receive at least 1 but not more than 4 adults who all receive benefits from a community mental health services program if the local community mental health services program monitors the services being delivered in the residential setting. (5) "Adult foster care family home" means a private residence with the approved capacity to receive at least 3 but not more than 6 adults to be provided with foster care. The adult foster care family home licensee must be a member of the household and an occupant of the residence. (6) "Adult foster care large group home" means an adult foster care facility with the approved capacity to receive at least 13 but not more than 20 adults to be provided with foster care. (7) "Adult foster care small group home" means an adult foster care facility with the approved capacity to receive at least 3 but not more than 12 adults to be provided with foster care. (8) "Aged" means an adult whose chronological age is 60 years of age or older or whose biological age, as determined by a physician, is 60 years of age or older. (9) "Assessment plan" means a written statement prepared in cooperation with a responsible agency or person that identifies the specific care and maintenance, services, and resident activities appropriate for each individual resident's physical and behavioral needs and well-being and the methods of providing the care and services taking into account the preferences and competency of the individual. (10) "Board" means food service provided at the adult foster care facility. Sec. 26a. (1) A resident of an adult foster care facility who is enrolled in a licensed hospice program is not considered to require continuous nursing care for the purpose of section 3(4). (2) A resident of an adult foster care facility, which facility is also licensed or exempt from licensure as a substance use disorder services program and is approved as a co-occurring enhanced crisis residential program, is not considered to require continuous nursing care for the purpose of section 3(4). (3) A licensee providing foster care to a resident who is enrolled in a licensed hospice program and whose assessment plan includes a do-not-resuscitate order or a validly executed POST form under part 56B of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5671 to 333.5685, is considered to be providing protection to the resident for purposes of section 6(5) and the rules promulgated under this act if, in the event the resident suffers cessation of both spontaneous respiration and circulation, the licensee contacts the licensed hospice program. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5729 (request no. H03349'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.